Illinois, session 104th, SB2851.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 6business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 7made for that purpose in Section 270 of Article 45 of Public 8Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the General 9Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity for a grant to Rosalind Franklin University of 11Medicine and Science for costs associated with the Community 12Care Connection (CCC) Mobile Health Program. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142026.